Massachusetts, session 194th, H2339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (b) by adding at the end thereof the following:
No additional discretionary grant programs may take compliance with G.L. c 40A, §3A
into consideration when making grant awards.
SECTION 2. Said Section 3A is hereby further amended by striking out subsection (c)
and inserting in place thereof the following:
(c) Any new or revised guidelines promulgated by the department of housing and
community development determining if an MBTA community is in compliance with this section
shall not take effect earlier than December 31, 2028.
of 2

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 2